Hawaii statutes.
[§466-33] Standards for peer reviews and
sponsoring organizations. (a) Except as otherwise provided by section
466-36, the board shall adopt the Standards for Performing and Reporting on
Peer Reviews and any applicable ethical requirements adopted by the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants and the public company accounting
oversight board firm inspection standards for public company audit firms
required under the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, as its minimum
standards for peer reviews.

(b) Subject to sections 466-40 and 466-41,
qualified sponsoring organizations shall be the American Institute of Certified
Public Accountants peer review program, the Hawaii Society of Certified Public
Accountants peer review program, state certified public accountant societies
fully involved in the administration of the American Institute of Certified
Public Accountants peer review program, the public company accounting oversight
board, the board, and other entities that are approved by the board. [L 2012, c
324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next